Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-945.01
Precedence of federal law.

To the extent that an occupational board or lawful occupation is also governed by federal law, federal law shall take precedence over the Occupational Board Reform Act. The act shall not be construed to preempt federal law governing lawful occupations in this state.

Laws 2024, LB16, § 8.
July 19, 2024